Utah statutes.
53A-3-603.   State board models, guidelines, and training.

(1)  The State Board of Education through the State Office of Education shall develop and provide models, guidelines, and training to school districts to enable each district to comply with Section 53A-3-602.5.

(2)  The models and guidelines shall focus on systematic, simplified organizational analysis and reporting of available data.

(3)  A school district is not restricted to using the models and guidelines developed by the board if it develops or finds a better approach for clearly communicating the data required under Section 53A-3-602.5.



Amended by Chapter 219, 2000 General Session

